test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-viidw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - vīdõ: # Verb 3 'eng /est viia/fin' - full paradigm
     vīdõ+V+Inf: vīdõ
     vīdõ+V+Ger: vīdsõ
     vīdõ+V+Ger: vīdsõ
     vīdõ+V+Sup: vīmõ
     vīdõ+V+Sup+Ine: vīmõõs
     vīdõ+V+Sup+Ela: vīmõõst
     vīdõ+V+Sup+Tra: vīmõõks
     vīdõ+V+Sup+Abe: vīmõõt
     vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vīb
     vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vītõ
     vīdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vībõd
     vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vīž
     vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vīžtõ
     vīdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vīžtõ
     vīdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vī
     vīdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: vīks
     vīdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vī
     vīdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: vī
     vīdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vīgid
     vīdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: vīgõ
     vīdõ+V+QuoSg3: vīji
     vīdõ+V+ActPrfPrc: vīnd
     vīdõ+V+PssPrfPrc: vīdõd
